New York, session 2025-2026, A210.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Preserving 2 Our Culinary Traditions Act". 3 § 2. Section 75-0109 of the environmental conservation law is amended 4 by adding a new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 5 5. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the 6 burning of wood, coal, natural gas, propane, or other fuels for the 7 purposes of cooking or otherwise preparing food shall be excluded from 8 any prohibitions or restrictions enacted as a result of compliance with 9 the mandates of the New York state climate leadership and community 10 protection act pursuant to chapter one hundred six of the laws of two 11 thousand nineteen, inclusive of any recommendations of any of such act's 12 derivative bodies, as well as any prohibitions or restrictions enacted 13 in accordance with local law or regulation. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00991-01-5